District of Columbia statutes.
10-119

Beach Parkway — Power of Secretary of Interior to sell not curtailed.

Nothing in §§ 10-117 to 10-119 shall be construed as curtailing the power of the Secretary of the Interior to sell the remainder of parcel 4 as provided for in Public Law No. 299, 72nd Congress, and should the exchange and dedication as provided for in § 10-117 fail to become effective the Secretary of the Interior is still authorized to sell the entire area of parcel 4 as provided for in that Act.

History

Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 882, ch. 741, § 3

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-119.
1973 Ed., § 8-123.